Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.34.180

Adjustment of wages, hours and conditions of employment.

Notwithstanding the appropriations for any salary or salary range of any employee or employees adopted in a final budget, the legislative body of any city may, by ordinance, change the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of any or all of its appointive employees if sufficient funds are available for appropriation to such purposes.

[ 1985 c 175 s 50.]